en: Non-alcoholic IPA
de: Alkoholfreies IPA
es: IPA sin alcohol
fr: IPA sans alcool
hr: Bezalkoholna ipa
hu: Alkoholmentes IPA
it: IPA analcolica
lt: Nealkoholinis IPA
nl: Alcoholvrije IPA

en: Non-alcoholic lager beers
lt: Nealkoholinis šviesusis alus

en: Non-alcoholic pilsner beers
lt: Nealkoholinis šviesusis pilsner alus

en: Non-alcoholic organic beers
fr: Bières biologiques sans alcool
hr: Bezalkoholna organska piva
it: Birre biologiche analcoliche
lt: nealkoholinis ekologiškas alus
nl: Biologische alcoholvrije bieren

en: Non-alcoholic radler beers, Non-alcoholic radler
lt: Nealkoholinis radler alus, Nealkoholinis radleris
nl: Radlers (alcoholvrij), Alcoholvrije radlers

en: Non-alcoholic wheat beers, Non-alcoholic wheat beer
de: Alkoholfreie Weizenbiere, Alkoholfreies Weizenbier, Alkoholfreie Weißbiere, Alkoholfreies Weißbier
fr: Bières de blé sans alcool
hr: Bezalkoholna pšenična piva
hu: Alkoholmentes búzasörök
it: Birre bianche analcoliche, Birre di frumento analcoliche
lt: Nealkoholinis kvietinis alus
nl: Alcoholvrije witbieren, Alcoholvrij witbier

en: Hard Seltzers
xx: Hard seltzers

en: Pure alcohol
de: Reiner Alkohol
es: Alcohol puro
fr: Alcool pur
hr: Čisti alkohol
hu: Tiszta alkohol
it: Alcool puro
nl: Pure alcohol

en: Hard liquors, liquors, spirits, hard spirits, Spirit drinks
bg: Твърд алкохол
de: Spirituosen, Spirituose, Stark alkoholische Getränke
fi: viinat
fr: Alcools forts, alcool fort, Boissons spiritueuses
hr: Žestoka pića
hu: Szeszesitalok, Szeszes italok, Tömény italok, Rövidek, Röviditalok
it: Superalcolici
lt: Stiprūs alkoholiniai gėrimai, spiritai, stiprieji spiritai
nl: Sterke alcoholica
ro: Băuturi spirtoase
ru: Крепкие алкогольные напитки
zh: 硬酒

en: Portuguese spirit drinks
es: Bebidas espirituosas portuguesas
fr: Boissons spiritueuses portugaises
hr: Portugalska žestoka pića
pt: Bebidas espirituosas portuguesas

en: Austrian spirit drinks
fr: Boissons spiritueuses autrichiennes

en: Croatian spirit drinks
de: Kroatische Spirituosen
es: Bebidas espirituosas croatas
fr: Boissons spiritueuses croates
hr: Hrvatska žestoka pića
hu: Horvát szeszesitalok

de: Deutsche Spirituosen
en: German spirit drinks
es: Bebidas espirituosas alemanas
fr: Boissons spiritueuses allemandes
hr: Njemačka žestoka pića
hu: Német szeszesitalok
it: Bevande alcoliche tedesche
lt: Vokietijos spiritiniai gėrimai
nl: Duitse sterke dranken
pt: Bebidas espirituosas alemãs
ru: Немецкие крепкие напитки
zh: 德国烈酒

en: Slovenian spirit drinks
fr: Boissons spiritueuses slovènes

en: Spanish spirit drinks
hu: Spanyol szeszesitalok

en: Distilled beverages
es: Bebidas destiladas
fr: boissons distillés
hr: Destilirana pića
hu: Italpárlatok
it: Distillati, Bevande spiritose
nl: Gedestilleerde dranken

en: distilled anis
fr: anis distillé

en: Distilled anis from Cyprus, Cypriot distilled anis
fr: Anis distillé de Chypre

en: Greek distilled anis
fr: Anis distillé grec

en: Ouzo
bg: Узо
el: Oύζο, Ouzo
hr: Uzo
hu: Úzó